files/usr/share/postgresql/9.6/tsearch_data/russian.affix
SFX S Y 40
SFX S   ЩК   Щ            [^О]ЩК
SFX S   ЩК   П            [^О]ЩК
SFX S   ЩК   Б            [^О]ЩК
SFX S   ЩК   0            [^О]ЩК
SFX S   ШОЩК ЕО           ШОЩК
SFX S   ШЛЙК ЕЛ           ШЛЙК
SFX S   ПК   Щ            [^ЗИ]ПК
SFX S   ПК   П            ПК
SFX S   ПК   Й            [ЗИ]ПК
SFX S   ПК   Б            ПК
SFX S   ПК   0            ПК
SFX S   ОЩК  Щ            ООЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  Щ            [^Ј]ООЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  ПО           МОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  П            ООЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  П            [^Ј]ООЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  ОЩ           [^О]ОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  ОП           [^О]ОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  ОБ           [^О]ОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  О            ЕОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  О            [ЈЕ]ОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  ЕО           [^ЕКМОШ]ОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  ЕО           [^ЈЕКМОШ]ОЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  Б            ООЩК
SFX S   ОЩК  Б            [^Ј]ООЩК
SFX S   ООЩК О            ООЩК
SFX S   ЛЙК  ПЛ           [^БЕЙКПХШЩ]ЛЙК
SFX S   ЛЙК  ПЛ           [^ЈБЕЙКПХШЩ]ЛЙК
SFX S   ЛЙК  Л            [БЕЙПХЩ]ЛЙК
SFX S   ЛЙК  Л            [ЈБЕЙПХЩ]ЛЙК
SFX S   КОЩК ЕО           КОЩК
SFX S   КЛЙК ЕЛ           КЛЙК
SFX S   ЙК   П            [ЗИЛ]ЙК
SFX S   ЙК   Й            [ЗИЛЦЭЮ]ЙК
SFX S   ЙК   Е            [ЦЭЮ]ЙК
SFX S   ЙК   Б            [ЗИЛЦЭЮ]ЙК
SFX S   ЙК   0            [ЗИЦЭЮ]ЙК
SFX S   ЈООЩК ЕОЩ          ЈООЩК
SFX S   ЈООЩК ЕОП          ЈООЩК
SFX S   ЈООЩК ЕОБ          ЈООЩК

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   ФШУС ЧЫЙУШ        [БЕЙПСХЩ]ФШУС
SFX R   ФШ   Ч            [БЕЙПСХЩ]ФШ
SFX R   УФШУС ЧЫЙУШ        УФШУС
SFX R   УФШ  Ч            УФШ

SFX Q Y 6
SFX Q   ПЧБФШУС ХСУШ         ПЧБФШУС
SFX Q   ПЧБФШ ХС           ПЧБФШ
SFX Q   ЕЧБФШУС ХСУШ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX Q   ЕЧБФШУС АСУШ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX Q   ЕЧБФШ ХС           [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX Q   ЕЧБФШ АС           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ

SFX P Y 12
SFX P   ЩФШУС ПСУШ         ЩФШУС
SFX P   ЩФШ  ПС           ЩФШ
SFX P   ФШУС УШ           [БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX P   ФШУС СУШ          [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX P   ФШУС СУШ          [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX P   ФШ   С            [БЕ]ФШ
SFX P   ФШ   С            [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX P   СФШ  С            [БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX P   ЙФШУС СУШ          [^ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС
SFX P   ЙФШУС БУШ          [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС
SFX P   ЙФШ  С            [^ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШ
SFX P   ЙФШ  Б            [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШ

SFX O Y 131
SFX O   Щ    БНЙ          Щ
SFX O   Щ    БН           Щ
SFX O   Щ    БИ           Щ
SFX O   ТЙО  Т            ТЙО
SFX O   ПФШ  ФСНЙ         ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФСН          ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФСИ          ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФС           ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФЙ           ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФЕН          ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФЕК          ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФЕ           ПФШ
SFX O   ПФШ  ФА           ПФШ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛХ           ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛПЧ          ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛПН          ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛЙ           ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛЕ           ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛБНЙ         ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛБН          ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛБИ          ПЛ
SFX O   ПЛ   ЛБ           ПЛ
SFX O   ОЙО  О            ОЙО
SFX O   ЙО   Щ            ТЙО
SFX O   ЙО   Е            ОЙО
SFX O   ЙО   БНЙ          ЙО
SFX O   ЙО   БН           ЙО
SFX O   ЙО   БИ           ЙО
SFX O   ЙК   ШС           ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЙНЙ         ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЙН          ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЙИ          ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЙ           ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЕНХ         ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЕН          ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЕК          ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЕЗП         ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ШЕ           ЙК
SFX O   ЙК   ША           ЙК
SFX O   Й    СНЙ          [БТУ]ФЙ
SFX O   Й    СНЙ          [БВЕЙМОПТУШ]Й
SFX O   Й    СН           [БВДЕЙМОПТУФШ]Й
SFX O   Й    СИ           [БВДЕЙМОПТУФШ]Й
SFX O   Й    БНЙ          [^БВДЕЙМОПТУФШ]Й
SFX O   Й    БН           [^БВДЕЙМОПТУФШ]Й
SFX O   Й    БИ           [^БВДЕЙМОПТУФШ]Й
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОСНЙ         ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОСН          ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОСИ          ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОС           ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОЙ           ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОЕН          ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОЕК          ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОЕ           ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕОШ  ОА           ЕОШ
SFX O   ЕМ   МЩ           ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МХ           ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МПЧ          ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МПН          ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МЕ           ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МБНЙ         ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МБН          ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МБИ          ЕМ
SFX O   ЕМ   МБ           ЕМ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛХ          [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛПЧ         [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛПН         [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛЙ          [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛЕ          [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛБНЙ        [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛБН         [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛБИ         [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ШЛБ          [МОТУ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛХ           [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛПЧ          [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛПН          [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛЙ           [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛЕ           [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛБНЙ         [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛБН          [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛБИ          [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕЛ   ЛБ           [ЦЫЮ]ЕЛ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГЩ          МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГХ          МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГЕ          МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГБНЙ        МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГБН         МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГБИ         МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ШГБ          МЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГЩ          [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГХ          [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГЕЧ         [БЕЙ]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГЕН         [БЕЙ]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГЕ          [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГБНЙ        [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГБН         [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГБИ         [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   КГБ          [БЕЙП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГЩ           [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГХ           [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГЕ           [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГБНЙ         [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГБН          [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГБИ          [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЕГ   ГБ           [^БЕЙМП]ЕГ
SFX O   ЈМ   МЩ           ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МХ           ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МПЧ          ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МПН          ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МЕ           ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МБНЙ         ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МБН          ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МБИ          ЈМ
SFX O   ЈМ   МБ           ЈМ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛХ          [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛПЧ         [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛПН         [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛЙ          [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛЕ          [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛБНЙ        [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛБН         [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛБИ         [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   ЈЛ   ШЛБ          [МОТУ]ЈЛ
SFX O   0    Х            ЙО
SFX O   0    ПН           ЙО
SFX O   0    НЙ           [БС]
SFX O   0    Н            [БС]
SFX O   0    И            [БС]
SFX O   0    ЕЧ           [БОСТ]Г
SFX O   0    Е            ЙО
SFX O   0    Б            ЙО

SFX N Y 17
SFX N   Ш    СНЙ          [^ЦЫЭЮ]Ш
SFX N   Ш    СН           [^ЦЫЭЮ]Ш
SFX N   Ш    СИ           [^ЦЫЭЮ]Ш
SFX N   Ш    Й            Ш
SFX N   Ш    ЕК           Ш
SFX N   Ш    БНЙ          [ЦЫЭЮ]Ш
SFX N   Ш    БН           [ЦЫЭЮ]Ш
SFX N   Ш    БИ           [ЦЫЭЮ]Ш
SFX N   0    Х            [^Ш]
SFX N   0    ПЧ           [^ГЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX N   0    ПН           [^ГЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX N   0    Е            [^Ш]
SFX N   0    БНЙ          [^Ш]
SFX N   0    БН           [^Ш]
SFX N   0    БИ           [^Ш]
SFX N   0    Б            [^Ш]
SFX N   0    А            Ш
